District of Columbia statutes.
47-1303.01

Definitions for §§ 47-1303.02 and 47-1303.03.

For the purpose of §§ 47-1303.02 and 47-1303.03, the term:

(1)

“Adjoining property” means real property that has, in whole or in part, a common boundary with the bid off property.

(2)

“Bid off property” means real property that has been bid off in the name of the District at public auction to enforce the District’s lien for unpaid taxes or assessments pursuant to § 47-1303 and for which the statutory redemption period has expired.

History

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 250, ch. 32, § 2a
as added Apr. 30, 1994, D.C. Law 10-115, § 202(a), 41 DCR 1216
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 54, 43 DCR 530
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1303.1.